Rhode Island statutes. Title 33 Probate Practice and Procedure
Chapter 9 Collection and Management of Decedents’ Estates

33-9-1.
Return of inventory of estate.

Every administrator and every executor, shall, within ninety (90) days after his or her appointment or such longer period as may be allowed by the probate court, return to the probate court, under oath, a true inventory of all the personal property, both tangible and intangible, and of all claims, rights, causes of actions and other assets, other than real property, of the deceased, with an appraisement thereof as of the date of the decedent’s death.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 866; G.L. 1909, ch. 313, § 1; P.L. 1919, ch. 1787, § 4; G.L. 1923, ch. 364, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 577, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

33-9-1

; P.L. 1990, ch. 405, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 110, § 4.

33-9-2.
Wearing apparel.

The wearing apparel of a deceased person, not including jewels and watches, shall not be included in the inventory nor be assets for the payment of debts, and if not bequeathed shall be distributed according to law.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 868; G.L. 1909, ch. 313, § 3; G.L. 1923, ch. 364, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 577, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

33-9-2

.

33-9-3.
Emblements of lands.

If any testator or intestate shall die after March 1 in any year, all the emblements of his or her lands that shall be severed before December 31 next following shall be included in the inventory and be assets in the hands of his or her executor or administrator; but all emblements growing on the lands at the time of the death of the testator or intestate, if that event happens on or after December 31 and before March 1, shall not so be included, but shall pass with the land.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 869; G.L. 1909, ch. 313, § 4; G.L. 1923, ch. 364, § 4; G.L. 1938, ch. 577, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

33-9-3

.

33-9-4.
Appraisal of property.

The property comprised in the inventory shall be appraised by the executor or administrator.

Upon the petition of any party in interest, the court may appoint one or more appraisers to value assets of the estate specified in the petition. The appraisers shall be sworn to the faithful discharge of their trust.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 867; G.L. 1909, ch. 313, § 2; P.L. 1915, ch. 1260, § 2; G.L. 1923, ch. 364, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 577, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

33-9-4

; P.L. 1977, ch. 95, § 1.

33-9-5.
Debts owed by executor to decedent.

The appointment of a debtor as an executor shall in no case be deemed an extinguishment of the debt; but all such debts shall be accounted for as assets by the executor, unless otherwise directed by the will.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 870; G.L. 1909, ch. 313, § 5; G.L. 1923, ch. 364, § 5; G.L. 1938, ch. 577, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

33-9-5

.

33-9-6.
Marking and care of decedent’s grave.

An executor or administrator of a solvent estate may erect a headstone, and with the permission of the probate court may erect a monument, and with like permission an executor or administrator of an insolvent estate may erect a headstone at the grave of his testator or intestate. An executor or administrator of a solvent estate may with the permission of the probate court pay to a cemetery corporation or to a town or city a reasonable sum for the perpetual care of the monument, the headstone, and the lot in which the body of the testator or intestate is buried. Where the permission of the probate court is required, it shall determine the amount of the payment and to whom the payment shall be paid. All reasonable payments made under this section shall be allowed as part of the funeral charges in the settlement of the accounts of the executor or administrator.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 969; G.L. 1909, ch. 318, § 4; P.L. 1921, ch. 2028, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 369, § 4; G.L. 1938, ch. 579, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

33-9-6

; P.L. 1960, ch. 22, § 1.

33-9-7.
Continuation of decedent’s business.

Executors and administrators may be authorized by the probate court before which the estate is in settlement to work up and complete any stock and materials in an unfinished state, or to continue any business of the decedent so far as may be expedient for the prudent winding up of the business, if the court shall find that it will be for the interest of the estate.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 849; G.L. 1909, ch. 312, § 35; G.L. 1923, ch. 363, § 35; G.L. 1938, ch. 575, § 33; G.L. 1956, §

33-9-7

.

33-9-8.
Redemption or sale of incumbered property.

The executor or administrator, if there be sufficient assets, may redeem all property of the deceased under mortgage, pledge, or levy, the redemption of which would increase the value of the estate, or he or she may sell the property subject to incumbrance; and the executor or administrator shall in that case first obtain the advice and direction of the probate court as to whether he or she shall redeem or sell the property subject to incumbrance, and failure to comply with the advice and direction shall be deemed maladministration and waste.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 850; G.L. 1909, ch. 312, § 36; G.L. 1923, ch. 363, § 36; G.L. 1938, ch. 575, § 34; G.L. 1956, §

33-9-8

.

33-9-9.
Real estate mortgages as personal property.

Debts due by mortgage of real estate and the mortgaged premises shall, unless the mortgage be foreclosed and the equity barred in the lifetime of the testator or intestate, be considered personal property for every purpose in settling the estates of deceased persons.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 875; G.L. 1909, ch. 313, § 10; G.L. 1923, ch. 364, § 10; G.L. 1938, ch. 577, § 10; G.L. 1956, §

33-9-9

.

33-9-10.
Sale of mortgage and debt.

The executor or administrator may sell the mortgage and the debt secured thereby in his or her discretion for the amount due thereon, and may sell the mortgage and the debt for a less amount upon obtaining the advice and direction therefor of the probate court upon a petition filed for that purpose.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 876; G.L. 1909, ch. 313, § 11; G.L. 1923, ch. 364, § 11; G.L. 1938, ch. 577, § 11; G.L. 1956, §

33-9-10

.

33-9-11.
Taking possession of property by mortgage.

The executor or administrator may take the surrender of, or sue in ejectment for, the seisin and possession of the real estate mortgaged as provided in §

33-9-9

; in which action it shall be sufficient for him or her to declare on the seisin and possession of the testator or intestate.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 877; G.L. 1909, ch. 313, § 12; G.L. 1923, ch. 364, § 12; G.L. 1938, ch. 577, § 12; G.L. 1956, §

33-9-11

.

33-9-12.
Possession and sale of property taken through mortgage.

Upon recovery or surrender of possession of real estate mortgaged as provided in §

33-9-11

, the executor or administrator shall be seised and possessed of the mortgaged estate, subject to liability to sale if necessary for the payment of debts, legacies or charges, of administration, in the manner provided by law for the sale of real estate by executors and administrators. The surplus proceeds of the sale, after payment of incidental expenses, debts, legacies, and expenses of administration, shall be held and distributed as personal property.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 878; G.L. 1909, ch. 313, § 13; G.L. 1923, ch. 364, § 13; G.L. 1938, ch. 577, § 13; G.L. 1956, §

33-9-12

.

33-9-13.
Redemption of mortgaged property from executor or administrator.

After surrender or recovery of possession of real estate mortgaged as provided in §

33-9-11

, and before sale as provided in §

33-9-12

, or in case the testator or intestate die possessed of any real estate mortgaged to him or her which may be redeemed, if the mortgagor, his or her heirs, executors, administrators, or assigns shall, within the time limited for redemption, redeem the mortgaged premises, the executor or administrator shall be entitled to receive the redemption money, and shall hold the money as personal property, and shall thereupon release and discharge the mortgaged premises by release, quitclaim, or other legal conveyance.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 879; G.L. 1909, ch. 313, § 14; G.L. 1923, ch. 364, § 14; G.L. 1938, ch. 577, § 14; G.L. 1956, §

33-9-13

.

33-9-14.
Authority of executor or administrator to borrow.

Whenever it shall for any reason appear to be desirable for an executor or administrator to borrow money, the superior court, upon bill or petition in equity filed by the executor or administrator, may authorize the executor or administrator to borrow, for any one or more of the purposes specified in §

33-9-15

, such sum or sums, for such period or periods of time, and upon such terms and conditions as the court shall deem advisable, and the court may authorize the executor or administrator to mortgage, pledge, or otherwise subject to lien, as security for the repayment of the money borrowed, the whole or any part or parts of the personal estate in his hands; provided, however, that property specifically bequeathed shall not be mortgaged, pledged, or otherwise subjected to lien so long as there remains personal property not specifically bequeathed which may be so mortgaged, pledged, or otherwise subjected to lien. For the purpose of exercising any powers so granted, an executor or administrator may execute such promissory notes, bonds, mortgages, deeds of trust or other instruments, containing such powers of sale, conditions, covenants or other provisions, as may be necessary or proper in the circumstances. In granting this authority, the court may impose such conditions or restrictions and give such directions as it may deem advisable; and the court may either direct that particular property may be so mortgaged or pledged, or may authorize the executor or administrator to mortgage or pledge the whole or such part or parts of the personal estate in his or her hands as he or she may in his or her discretion deem advisable, subject, however, to the provisions in regard to property specifically bequeathed.

History of Section.

G.L., ch. 312, § 56, as enacted by P.L. 1921, ch. 2030, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 363, § 56; G.L. 1938, ch. 575, § 54; G.L. 1956, §

33-9-14

.

33-9-15.
Purposes for which borrowing authorized.

Borrowing may be authorized for any one or more of the following purposes:

To discharge any existing lien or mortgage on the real or personal estate of the decedent;

To pay the debts of the decedent;

To pay the funeral expenses;

To pay the charges of administration;

To pay the estate, inheritance, legacy, or succession taxes;

To pay the expenses of supporting the decedent’s family as prescribed by law;

To pay the legacies under the will; and

For any other purpose whatsoever which the court may approve as necessary or desirable for the protection or benefit of the estate.

History of Section.

G.L., ch 312, § 56, as enacted by P.L. 1921, ch. 2030, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 363, § 56; G.L. 1938, ch. 575, § 54; G.L. 1956, §

33-9-15

.

33-9-16.
Effect of borrowing by executor or administrator.

Any borrowing authorized as provided in §

33-9-14

shall create a debt of the estate, and any mortgage, pledge, or lien authorized as provided in §

33-9-14

shall be, to the extent and in the manner authorized, binding upon the property so mortgaged; provided, however that nothing contained in §§ 33-9-14 —

33-9-17

shall be held to affect the right of the executor or administrator subsequently to contest the validity of any claim against the estate for the payment of which the borrowing was authorized. And no transaction, and no note, bond, covenant, or other obligation executed or entered into as a part of or as an incident to the transaction shall bind the executor or administrator personally, insofar as the transaction, note, bond, covenant, or other obligation is made or entered into by the executor or administrator in his or her representative capacity.

History of Section.

G.L., ch. 312, § 56, as enacted by P.L. 1921, ch. 2030, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 363, § 56; G.L. 1938, ch. 575, § 54; G.L. 1956, §

33-9-16

.

33-9-17.
Lender not liable for loss or misapplication.

No person lending money to an executor or administrator who has been authorized to borrow by the court in accordance with the provisions of §§

33-9-14

—

33-9-16

shall be required to see to the application or be answerable for any loss or misapplication thereof.

History of Section.

G.L., ch. 312, § 56, as enacted by P.L. 1921, ch. 2030, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 363, § 56; G.L. 1938, ch. 575, § 54; G.L. 1956, §

33-9-17

.

33-9-18.
Authority to lend, invest, vote, and protect investments.

The superior court may, upon complaint filed by an executor or administrator, authorize the executor or administrator to invest money belonging to the estate in such safe investments as it may approve, and may likewise authorize or direct the executor or administrator to vote the stock or shares belonging to the estate in any corporation, association, or joint stock company in such manner and for such purposes as the court may deem advisable; and if it shall in the court’s opinion be in the interest of the estate so to do, the court may authorize the executor or administrator:

To lend money belonging to the estate to any corporation, association, or joint stock company, in the stock, shares, or obligations of which any portion of the estate may be invested, or in which the estate may be otherwise interested;

To invest money belonging to the estate in the stock, shares, or other obligations of any such corporation, association, or joint stock company;

To endorse or guarantee the obligations of the corporation, association, or joint stock company.

In granting the authority, the court may impose such conditions or restrictions and give such directions as it may deem advisable.

The superior court may, upon any complaint, approve any investment, loan, endorsement, guaranty, or vote previously made or given by an executor or administrator which the court might have authorized, and the approval shall have the same effect as a prior order or decree authorizing the investment, loan, endorsement, guaranty, or vote. Any endorsement or guaranty shall be binding upon the estate, and shall not be binding upon the executor or administrator personally.

The powers herein conferred upon the superior court may be exercised in cases where the court deems it necessary for the protection or preservation of the estate or to prevent irreparable damage or loss to the estate, notwithstanding any provisions or directions contained in a will authorizing or restricting the powers of an executor or administrator with the will annexed to invest or lend money of the estate, to endorse or guarantee obligations, or to vote the stock or shares belonging to the estate in any corporation, association, or joint stock company; provided, however, that the court shall exercise these powers with extreme caution and shall not exercise these powers in cases where the testator has in the will expressly declared or requested that the powers shall not be exercised by the court.

History of Section.

G.L., ch. 312, § 57, as enacted by P.L. 1921, ch. 2030, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 363, § 57; G.L. 1938, ch. 575, § 55; G.L. 1956, §

33-9-18

.

33-9-19.
General powers of executor or administrator unaffected.

Nothing contained in §§

33-9-14

—

33-9-18

shall be held to limit or restrict any powers which an executor or administrator may have apart from the provisions of those sections.

History of Section.

G.L., ch. 312, § 58, as enacted by P.L. 1921, ch. 2030, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 363, § 58; G.L. 1938, ch. 575, § 56; G.L. 1956, §

33-9-19

.

33-9-20.
Representation of contingent interests and persons non sui juris.

Whenever in any proceeding under §§

33-9-14

—

33-9-18

there are contingent interests of persons not in being or not ascertainable or interests of persons non sui juris, the court may appoint a person to represent the contingent interests or a guardian ad litem to represent the interests of persons non sui juris, and in case of that representation the decree entered in the proceeding shall bind all interests.

History of Section.

G.L., ch. 312, § 59, as enacted by P.L. 1921, ch. 2030, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 363, § 59; G.L. 1938, ch. 575, § 57; G.L. 1956, §

33-9-20

.

33-9-21.
Appeals to supreme court.

An appeal may be taken to the supreme court from any final order or decree of the superior court entered in any proceeding brought under the provisions of §§

33-9-14

—

33-9-18

at any time within ten (10) days from the entry of the order or decree.

History of Section.

G.L., ch. 312, § 60, as enacted by P.L. 1921, ch. 2030, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 363, § 60; G.L. 1938, ch. 575, § 58; G.L. 1956, §

33-9-21

.

33-9-22.
Validity of acts by executor or administrator subsequently removed — Validity of purchases from devisees, legatees, or heirs.

When an executor or administrator is removed, or when letters of administration or decrees are revoked, all previous sales whether of real or personal estate, lawfully made by an executor or administrator and with good faith on the part of the purchaser, and all other lawful acts done by the executor or administrator, shall remain valid and effectual. A decree allowing a will or compromise of a will or adjudicating the intestacy of the estate of a deceased person in any court in the state having jurisdiction thereof shall, after one year from the rendition thereof or, if proceedings for its reversal are had, after one year from its establishment, or in the event that administration of the estate has been fully completed within one year after the rendition or establishment, as the case may be, then after completion of administration of the estate, be final and conclusive in favor of purchasers for value in good faith without notice of any adverse claims of any property, real or personal, from devisees, legatees, or heirs claiming under the will or estate, or from their executors, administrators, guardians, or conservators. This section shall not make an adjudication of the fact of death conclusive.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 851; G.L. 1909, ch. 312, § 37; G.L. 1923, ch. 363, § 37; G.L. 1938, ch. 575, § 35; G.L. 1956, §

33-9-22

; P.L. 1959, ch. 107, § 1.

33-9-23.
Master’s deed to convey decedent’s property to party entitled to specific performance.

When a person dies holding the legal title to property, real or personal, and an action for specific performance of contract for sale thereof would have existed as against the deceased had he or she lived, a complaint against the executor or administrator alone of the deceased may be brought by the person with whom the deceased has made the contract, setting out the facts, the pendency of which bill shall be advertised at least twice each week for three (3) successive weeks in some newspaper published in the city of Providence, which notice shall be in addition to legal notice to the executor or administrator. And on hearing the cause, if it appear that a proper case has been made out, the superior court shall decree that a conveyance shall be made by a master to be appointed for that purpose whose deed shall vest the title of the deceased in the party entitled to specific performance on payment of the purchase price, which, less the costs of the suit, including costs as between solicitor and client, shall be personal assets in the hands of the executor or administrator.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 208, § 21; C.P.A. 1905, § 1220; G.L. 1909, ch. 259, § 21; G.L. 1923, ch. 303, § 21; G.L. 1938, ch. 583, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

33-9-23

.

33-9-24.
Continuation of actions by or against decedent.

In case any action, suit, or proceeding is commenced or shall be pending in any court, and either party shall die before final judgment, the executor or administrator of the deceased person, or his or her successor in case the deceased was acting in a representative capacity, may, if the cause of action survives, prosecute or defend the action, suit, or proceeding to final judgment.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 970; G.L. 1909, ch. 318, § 5; G.L. 1923, ch. 369, § 5; G.L. 1938, ch. 579, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

33-9-24

.

33-9-25.
Substitution and execution by successor administrator.

Whenever any judgment shall have been recovered by or in the name of any executor or administrator, a succeeding administrator of the estate not administered may on motion be substituted as plaintiff and may take out execution upon the judgment.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 993; G.L. 1909, ch. 318, § 28; G.L. 1923, ch. 369, § 28; G.L. 1938, ch. 579, § 28; G.L. 1956, §

33-9-25

; P.L. 1965, ch. 55, § 60.

33-9-26.
Liability of executor in own wrong.

Any person who shall embezzle or shall, without being thereto authorized by law, injuriously intermeddle with any personal property of a deceased person shall be liable as an executor in his or her own wrong to the creditors and other persons aggrieved.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 844; G.L. 1909, ch. 312, § 30; G.L. 1923, ch. 363, § 30; G.L. 1938, ch. 575, § 28; G.L. 1956, §

33-9-26

.

33-9-27.
Personal liability of executor or administrator for debts of estate.

No executor or administrator, except an executor in his or her own wrong, shall be holden to bail upon mesne process, nor shall his or her property be attached, nor his or her person arrested, nor his or her person or property taken on execution, for the debts or legacies of the testator or intestate, except upon suggestion of waste as provided in §

33-9-28

; but in such suits the writs of attachment and execution shall run against the goods, chattels, rights, and credits of the deceased only in the hands of the executor or administrator.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 991; G.L. 1909, ch. 318, § 26; G.L. 1923, ch. 369, § 26; G.L. 1938, ch. 579, § 26; G.L. 1956, §

33-9-27

.

33-9-28.
Civil action with suggestion of waste.

If execution shall issue against the estate of the testator or intestate in the hands of the executor or administrator, and the officer charged with the service thereof shall return thereon that he or she cannot find any estate whereon to levy the execution, and that the execution has not been satisfied by the executor or administrator, a civil action may be brought in the same court within two (2) years after the date of the first publication of the notice of the qualification of the first executor or administrator against the executor or administrator, alleging a suggestion or waste; and after process has been duly served by the officer to whom it shall be directed and by him or her returned, if the executor or administrator makes default of appearance, or, coming in, shall not show sufficient cause to the contrary, judgment and execution shall be awarded against him or her and his or her own proper estate for the sum recovered, with interest due thereon, with costs, and, for want of estate, against the body of the executor or administrator.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 992; G.L. 1909, ch. 318, § 27; G.L. 1923, ch. 369, § 27; G.L. 1938, ch. 579, § 27; G.L. 1956, §

33-9-28

; P.L. 1965, ch. 55, § 60.

33-9-29.
Descent or distribution of real estate to be recorded.

When the real property of any deceased person, or any part thereof or interest therein, is devised or distributed or set out to the devisee or devisees, heir or heirs, or spouse of the decedent, or is legally divided by all the persons interested, or descends to the heir or heirs or spouse of the decedent, the executor or administrator of the decedent, shall cause a certificate of descent to be recorded in the land evidence records of every city or town in which real property of the decedent is situated, and it shall constitute prima facie evidence of the facts stated in it, so far as those facts affect real estate of the decedent.

History of Section.

P.L. 2001, ch. 296, § 2; P.L. 2006, ch. 589, § 2.

33-9-30.
Donation of conservation easement.

An executor or administrator may donate a conservation easement on any real property in order to obtain the benefit of the estate tax exclusion allowed under sections 170 and 2031(c), respectively, of the United States Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, if:

The will authorizes or directs the executor to donate a conservation easement on the real property; or

Each interested party who has an interest in the real property that would be affected by the conservation easement consents in writing to the donation.

History of Section.

P.L. 2009, ch. 98, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 99, § 1.